Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1807
General nonmedical nutrition information, defined.

General nonmedical nutrition information means information on any of the following:

(1) Principles of good nutrition and food preparation;

(2) Food that should be included in the normal diet;

(3) Essential nutrients needed by the human body;

(4) Recommended amounts of essential nutrients required by the human body;

(5) Actions of nutrients in the human body; and

(6) Food and supplements that are good sources of essential nutrients required by the human body.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 629;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 29.